Connecticut, session 2026, HB05183.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
one million seven hundred thousand dollars, the proceeds of which
shall be used by the Department of Emergency Services and Public
Protection for the purpose of providing a grant-in-aid to the Yantic Fire
Engine Company in the city of Norwich for an exhaust system upgrade.